District of Columbia statutes.
42-301

Present or future and vested or contingent interests conveyed by deed or will.

Any interest in or claim to real estate whether entitling to present or future possession and enjoyment, and whether vested or contingent, may be disposed of by deed or will, and any estate which would be good as an executory devise may be created by deed.

History

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1269, ch. 854, § 512
June 30, 1902, 32 Stat. 532, ch. 1329

Cross References

Statute of frauds, see §§ 28-3501 and 28-3503.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 45-301.
1973 Ed., § 45-101.

Editor's Notes

Severance of joint tenancies: This section and § 42-305 do not supersede the common law rule authorizing the unilateral severance of joint tenancies. Estate of Gulledge, App. D.C., 673 A.2d 1278 (1996).